Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Subject to the availability of funds, the Oregon Health Authority shall im-
plement a program for providing to emergency departments in real time notifications that:
(1) Identify patients with hemoglobinopathies; and
(2) Provide information on how to contact a hematologist in real time.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall consult with  interested stakeholders
to inform the authority  in implementing the program described under section 1 of this 2025
Act. Interested stakeholders must include, at a minimum, the following persons:
(a) A person from  the authority’s Office of Health Information Technology and Analytics
Infrastructure.
(b) A person with relevant experience who represents a hospital.
(c) A person who represents a community organization  that serves patients with sickle
cell disease or other hemoglobinopathies.
(d) A person who represents public health organizations.
(e) Health care providers with relevant experience, including but not limited to:
(A) Hematologists.
(B) Hematology nurses.
(C) Emergency physicians.
(D) Emergency nurses.
(E) Emergency room nurses.
(F) Emergency medical technicians.
(G) Paramedics.
(2) A member of the Legislative Assembly or a staff  member for a member of the Leg-
islative Assembly may participate  in the authority’s efforts to consult with interested
stakeholders.
(3) The authority shall  submit a report on the information gathered from interested
stakeholders under this section and  the status of the program described under section 1 of
this 2025 Act in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include  recommendations for
legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to health care no
later than March 1, 2026.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
Enrolled House Bill 2940 (HB 2940-A) Page 1
SECTION 4. Subject to the availability of funds, the Oregon Health Authority shall im-
plement the program described under section 1 of this 2025 Act no later than May 1, 2026.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House April 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 3, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2940 (HB 2940-A) Page 2